Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1528XS (5) 91 je/js S.F. 187 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âPay Transparency and Fairness Actâ. 2 Sec. 2. Section 216.6A, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 3 following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. It shall be an unfair or discriminatory 5 practice for any employer or agent of any employer to do any of 6 the following: 7 a. Require, as a condition of employment, that an employee 8 refrain from disclosing, discussing, or sharing information 9 about the amount of the employeeâs wages, benefits, or other 10 compensation or from inquiring, discussing, or sharing 11 information about any other employeeâs wages, benefits, or 12 other compensation. 13 b. Require, as a condition of employment, that an employee 14 sign a waiver or other document that requires an employee to 15 refrain from engaging in any of the activities permitted under 16 paragraph âaâ . 17 c. Discriminate or retaliate against an employee for 18 engaging in any of the activities permitted under paragraph âaâ . 19 d. Seek salary history information, including but not 20 limited to information on compensation and benefits, from 21 a potential employee as a condition of a job interview or 22 employment. This paragraph shall not be construed to prohibit 23 a prospective employer from asking a prospective employee what 24 salary level the prospective employee would require in order to 25 accept a job. 26 e. Release the salary history, including but not limited 27 to information on compensation and benefits, of any current 28 or former employee to any prospective employer in response to 29 a request as part of an interview or hiring process without 30 written authorization from such current or former employee. 31 f. Publish, list, or post within the employerâs 32 organization, with any employment agency, job-listing 33 service, or internet site, or in any other public manner, an 34 advertisement to recruit candidates for hire or independent 35 -1- LSB 1528XS (5) 91 je/js 1/ 5 S.F. 187 contractors to fill a position within the employerâs 1 organization without including the minimum rate of pay of the 2 position. The rate of pay may be by the hour, shift, day, week, 3 salary, piece, commission, or other applicable rate. The rate 4 of pay shall include overtime and allowances, if any, claimed 5 as part of the minimum wage, including but not limited to 6 tipped wages. 7 g. Pay a newly hired employee at less than the rate of pay 8 advertised for the employeeâs position under paragraph âfâ . 9 Sec. 3. Section 216.6A, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 3. a. It shall be an affirmative defense to a claim arising 12 under this section if any of the following applies: 13 a. (1) Payment of wages is made pursuant to a seniority 14 system. 15 b. (2) Payment of wages is made pursuant to a merit system. 16 c. (3) Payment of wages is made pursuant to a system which 17 that measures earnings by quantity or quality of production. 18 d. (4) Pay differential is based on any other bona fide 19 factor other than the age, race, creed, color, sex, sexual 20 orientation, gender identity, national origin, religion, 21 or disability of such employee , including but not limited 22 to a bona fide factor relating to education, training, or 23 experience . This affirmative defense shall apply only if 24 the employer demonstrates that the factor is not based on or 25 derived from a differential in compensation based on age, 26 race, creed, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, 27 national origin, religion, or disability; is job related with 28 respect to the position in question; and is consistent with 29 a business necessity. For purposes of this subparagraph, 30 âbusiness necessityâ means an overriding legitimate business 31 purpose such that the factor relied upon effectively fulfills 32 the business purpose it is supposed to serve. This affirmative 33 defense shall not apply if the employee demonstrates that an 34 alternative business practice exists that would serve the same 35 -2- LSB 1528XS (5) 91 je/js 2/ 5 S.F. 187 business purpose without producing the wage differential. 1 b. An affirmative defense under this subsection is not 2 applicable unless one or more of the defenses listed in 3 paragraph âaâ account for the entire pay differential that is 4 the subject of the claim. 5